Missouri, session 2026, SB995.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 57.450 and 57.452, RSMo, are repealed
and two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as
sections 57.450 and 57.452, to read as follows:
57.450. 1. The sheriff of the City of St. Louis shall
be appointed by a majority of the circuit judges and
associate circuit judges of the twenty-second judicial
circuit, en banc. The sheriff in such circuit shall be
removable for cause by a majority of the circuit judges and
associate circuit judges of such circuit, en banc, in
accordance with the Missouri supreme court administrative
rules governing court personnel. Such sheriff shall meet
the same qualifications and requirements specified in
subsection 1 of section 57.010 for elected sheriffs. The
elected sheriff holding office on August 28, 2026, shall
continue to hold such office for the remainder of his or her
term. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 57.080 to
the contrary, should a vacancy occur from any cause in the
office of sheriff of the City of St. Louis during the
remainder of the current term of the elected sheriff, the
vacancy shall be filled by appointment by a majority of the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 995 2
circuit judges and associate circuit judges of the twenty-
second judicial circuit, en banc.
2. All general laws relating and applicable to the
sheriffs of the several counties of this state shall apply
to the same officer in the City of St. Louis, except that
the sheriff of the City of St. Louis shall not enforce the
general criminal laws of the state of Missouri unless such
enforcement shall be incidental to the duties customarily
performed by the sheriff of the City of St. Louis. The
sheriff and sworn deputies of the office of sheriff of the
City of St. Louis may be eligible for training and licensure
by the peace officer standards and training commission under
chapter 590, and such office shall be considered a law
enforcement agency with the sheriff and sworn deputies
considered law enforcement officers. All acts and parts of
acts providing for any legal process to be directed to any
sheriff of any county shall be so construed as to mean the
sheriff of the City of St. Louis as if such officer were
specifically named in such act.
57.452. The provisions of section 590.180 shall not
apply to any [elected or appointed] sheriff of a city not
within a county.
✓